Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF695.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325F.677] AVAILABILITY OF WATER AT PLACES OF ENTERTAINMENT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Entertainment" has the meaning given in section 325F.676, subdivision 1, paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (c) "Place of entertainment" has the meaning given in section 325F.676, subdivision 1, paragraph (h). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Available water requirement. new text end new text begin While entertainment is occurring, a place of entertainment must provide attendees with access to potable water by: new text end new text begin (1) providing bottled water at no cost to the attendees; new text end new text begin (2) allowing attendees to bring bottled water into the place of entertainment; or new text end new text begin (3) allowing attendees to bring an empty water bottle to the place of entertainment and providing attendees with access to potable water to fill the bottle. new text end